Vermont, session 2025-2026, H220.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. CHILDREN IN NEED OF SUPERVISION; STATUTORY
REVISION TASK FORCE; REPORT
(a) Creation. There is created the CHINS Statutory Revision Task Force to
review and consider revising the Vermont statutes governing children in need
of supervision.
(b) Membership. The Task Force shall be composed of the following
members:
VT LEG #379465 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.220
2025 Page 2 of 3
(1) the Chief Superior Judge of the Vermont Superior Court or designee;
(2) the Attorney General or designee;
(3) the Defender General or designee;
(4) the Commissioner of the Department for Children and Families or
designee;
(5) the Vermont Child, Youth, and Family Advocate or designee;
(6) the Executive Director of the Department of State’s Attorneys and
Sheriffs or designee;
(7) the Executive Director of the Vermont Parent Representation Center,
Inc. or designee;
(8) the Executive Director of Prevent Child Abuse Vermont or designee;
and
(9) the Executive Director of Lund or designee.
(c) Powers and duties. The Task Force shall study Vermont’s statutes
governing children in need of supervision, including the following issues:
(1) whether the definition of “reasonable efforts” under 33 V.S.A.
§ 5102(25) should be updated;
(2) whether 33 V.S.A. § 5102 should otherwise be revised; and
(3) whether 33 V.S.A. chapter 53 should be amended generally.
VT LEG #379465 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.220
2025 Page 3 of 3
(d) Assistance. The Task Force shall have the administrative, technical,
and legal assistance of the State entities referenced in subdivisions (b)(1)–(6)
of this section.
(e) Report. On or before November 15, 2025, the Task Force shall submit
a written report to Joint Legislative Justice Oversight Committee, the Senate
Committee on Judiciary, and the House Committee on Judiciary with its
findings and any recommendations for legislative action.
(f) Meetings.
(1) The Chief Superior Judge of the Vermont Superior Court shall call
the first meeting of the Task Force to occur on or before July 1, 2025.
(2) The Task Force shall select a chair from among its members at the
first meeting.
(3) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(4) The Task Force shall cease to exist on February 1, 2026.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379465 v.1